trunk/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="dum__adj"><e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mere</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>      
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="lykkelig__adj">
       <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ere</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mild__adj">
       <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ere</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>est</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="absolut/__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aktiv__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amerikansk__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="grusom__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mere</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="modsat__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="grimme__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ste</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l/ang__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ængere</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anges</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ang</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>angt</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ange</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="besked/en__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rust/en__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="munt/er__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/gammel__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ældre</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamles</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gammelt</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gammel</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamle</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ældste</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="arabisk"><p><l>arabiske</l><r>arabisk</r></p><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bange"><i>bange</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="beskeden"><i>besked</i><par n="besked/en__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="blind"><i>blind</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="blond"><p><l>blonde</l><r>blond</r></p><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="brun"><i>brun</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dansk"><i>dansk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dum"><i>dum</i><par n="dum__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dyb"><i>dyb</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dyr"><i>dyr</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ejendommelig"><p><l>ejendommeligt</l><r>ejendommelig</r></p><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="elektrisk"><i>elektrisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="eneste"><i>eneste</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fattig"><i>fattig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="flad"><i>flad</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fornuftig"><i>fornuftig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forskellig"><i>forskellig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fransk"><i>fransk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fri"><i>fri</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fuld"><i>fuld</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gammel"><i></i><par n="/gammel__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="generel"><i>generel</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="grim"><p><l>grimme</l><r>grim</r></p><par n="grimme__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="grusom"><i>grusom</i><par n="grusom__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hel"><i>hel</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hvid"><i>hvid</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="interessant"><i>interessant</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="international"><i>international</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jaloux"><i>jaloux</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kold"><i>kold</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lang"><i>l</i><par n="l/ang__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="langsom"><i>langsom</i><par n="dum__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="latterlig"><i>latterlig</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lav"><i>lav</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="levende"><i>levende</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="livlig"><p><l>livligt</l><r>livlig</r></p><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lykkelig"><i>lykkelig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lys"><i>lys</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mandlig"><i>mandlig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="modsat"><i>modsat</i><par n="modsat__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mulig"><i>mulig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="munter"><i>munt</i><par n="munt/er__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="naturlig"><i>naturlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nem"><i>nem</i><par n="dum__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ny"><i>ny</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nysgerrig"><i>nysgerrig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="offensiv"><i>offensiv</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="offentlig"><i>offentlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="oprindelig"><i>oprindelig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="politisk"><i>politisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ren"><i>ren</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rig"><i>rig</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rusten"><i>rust</i><par n="rust/en__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sandsynlig"><i>sandsynlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skyldig"><p><l>skyldige</l><r>skyldig</r></p><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sur"><i>sur</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svag"><i>svag</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sympatisk"><i>sympatisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="systematisk"><i>systematisk</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tidlig"><i>tidlig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tom"><i>tom</i><par n="dum__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tydelig"><i>tydelig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ubehagelig"><i>ubehagelig</i><par n="absolut/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="utilfreds"><i>utilfreds</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vanskelig"><i>vanskelig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="varm"><i>varm</i><par n="mild__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="venlig"><i>venlig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vigtig"><i>vigtig</i><par n="lykkelig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="voksen"><i>voks</i><par n="besked/en__adj"/></e>
